src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ============ !
! Proper nouns !
! ============ !

! Note: the final non-Sámi consonants:
!          b  d  g  h  m  n  p  t  z
! write as b9 d9 g9 h9 m9 n9 p9 t9 z9

! (t9 in consonant clusters)
! Note: the final vowel e9, used for e-stems that NEVER may have illatives
! in -ii (Mandrake:Mandrakei, iige *Mandrakii)

! j that shall always be j (also in V_C) is written j9, as eg. in Ajja (Aj9ja)

! Table of content
! ----------------
! Continuation lexica
!  Firstpart tag
!  Case etc tags
! Personal names
!  First names
!  Surnames
! Place names
! ----------------


! Continuation lexica
! ===================

! FirstTag

LEXICON FirstTag

+N+Prop+Attr: flag# ;
+N+Prop+Cmp/SgNom: RHyph ;


!< +N:0 +Prop:0 +Attr:0 0:%> "@U.Cap.Obl@" > # ;

! Names Proper

! Some of the entries point to continuation lexica in the sme-lex.txt
! file, su^ch as GOAHTI. This implies that names have the same inflection as
! ordinary nouns, whi^ch is probably not true. These lexica must thus be re-
! vised as soon as the lexica for names become more accurate.

! Continuation lexica for personal names
! --------------------------------------

LEXICON HANNOLA-sur
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:a%> ACCRADECL ;

LEXICON HANNOLA-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:a%>  ACCRADECL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:a%>  ACCRADECL_PLC-ORG ;
:%> PLACELASH ;



! Vowel final names
! - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON GIRUNA-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:a ACCRADECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:a ACCRADECL ;

LEXICON OY-sur
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> OYDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>a ACCRA-OBL ;

LEXICON OY-fem
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%> OYDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>a ACCRA-OBL ;

!LEXICON OY-mal
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%> OYDECL ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>a ACCRA-OBL ;


LEXICON OY-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> OYDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> OYDECL ;
:%>a PLACELASH ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>a ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>a ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>s flagK ;

LEXICON OYDECL
+Sg+Nom: flagK ;
+Cmp/SgNom:%> flagRHyph ;
+Cmp/SgNom:%> RProp ;
+Ess:%>an flagK ;
:%>a ACCRA-I ;
:%>aX5 ACCRA-IICASE-SGCOM ;
+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:j flagK ;
+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:ij flagK ;


LEXICON ACCRA-ani
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%> ACCRADECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:%>ž PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON ACCRA-obj
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> ACCRADECL ;

LEXICON ACCRA-LOAN-obj
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> ACCRADECL-LOAN ;

LEXICON ACCRA-objplc
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> ACCRADECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> ACCRADECL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> ACCRADECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON ACCRA-org
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> ACCRADECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON ACCRA-LOAN-org
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> ACCRADECL-LOAN ;

LEXICON ACCRA-mal
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>  ACCRADECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>  VILLE ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:%>ž PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON ACCRA-malsur
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>  ACCRADECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>  ACCRADECL ;

LEXICON ACCRA-fem
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>  ACCRADECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>  VILLE ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:%>ž PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON ACCRA-femsur
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>  ACCRADECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>  VILLE ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>  ACCRADECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>  VILLE ;

LEXICON ACCRA-femplc !Names that are both female names and place names
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>  ACCRADECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>  VILLE ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> ACCRADECL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>  VILLE ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> ACCRADECL_PLC-ORG ;
:%> PLACELASH ;

LEXICON ACCRA-malfem
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>  ACCRADECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>  ACCRADECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>  VILLE ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>  VILLE ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:%>ž PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:%>ž PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON ACCRA-sur
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> ACCRADECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>  VILLE ;

LEXICON ACCRA-LOAN-plc ! Place names
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>  ACCRADECL-LOAN ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>  ACCRADECL-LOAN ;
+Err/Lex:%> PLACELASH ; !

LEXICON ACCRA-A-plc
:a ACCRA-plc ;

LEXICON ACCRA-A-org
:a ACCRA-org ;


LEXICON ACCRA-A_MWE-plc
:a ACCRA_MWE-plc ;

LEXICON ACCRA-A-fem
:a ACCRA-fem ;

LEXICON ACCRA_MWE-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>  ACCRADECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON ACCRA-plc ! Place names
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>  ACCRADECL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>  ACCRADECL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>  VILLE ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>  VILLE ;
:%> PLACELASH ;

LEXICON ACCRA-plc-not-sur ! Place names
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>  ACCRADECL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>  VILLE ;
:%> PLACELASH ;

LEXICON MOLDAVIA-plc
:a ACCRA-plc ;

LEXICON MOLDAVIA-LOAN-plc
:a ACCRA-LOAN-plc ;

LEXICON MALAWI-plc
:i ACCRA-plc ;

LEXICON MACKENZIE-plc
:e ACCRA-plc ;

LEXICON PERU-plc
BISSAU-plc ;

LEXICON BISSAU-plc ! Bissau beacuse of ill-form Bissauii
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>  ACCRADECL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> ACCRA-DC ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> ACCRA-IICASE-SGCOM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>i ACCRA-I ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> ACCRA-DC ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> ACCRA-IICASE-SGCOM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>i ACCRA-I ;
:%> PLACELASH ;


LEXICON ACCRA ! Vowel-final names without Gradation and Ill ^change
+N+Prop:%> ACCRADECL ;

! Separate lexicon for ACCRA y final names because these have to go NYSTØ in smj, but cannot be NYSTØ in sma

LEXICON ACCRA-Y-fem
 ACCRA-fem ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen:a flagK ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Acc:a flagK ;

LEXICON ACCRA-Y-obj
 ACCRA-obj ;

LEXICON ACCRA-Y-plc
 ACCRA-plc ;

LEXICON ACCRA-Y_MWE-plc
 ACCRA_MWE-plc ;

LEXICON ACCRA-Y-mal
 ACCRA-mal ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen:a flagK ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc:a flagK ;


LEXICON ACCRA-Y-sur
 ACCRA-sur ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:a flagK ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:a flagK ;

LEXICON ACCRA-Y-malsur
 ACCRA-mal ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:a flagK ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:a flagK ;
 ACCRA-sur ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:a flagK ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:a flagK ;


LEXICON ACCRA-Y-org
 ACCRA-org ;

LEXICON ACCRA-Y-ani
 ACCRA-ani ;

LEXICON VILLE
+Sg+Ill:i  flagK ; ! -ei
+Sg+Com:in flagK ; ! -ei
+Pl+Gen:id9 flagK ; ! -ei
+Pl+Acc:id9 flagK ; ! -ei
+Pl+Ill:ide flagK ; ! -ei
+Pl+Loc:in flagK ; ! -ei
+Pl+Com:igujn flagK ; ! -ei



LEXICON ACCRADECL
! These sublexica are irrelevant for ACCRA, but added
! for the sake of the lexicon MARJA
ACCRA-DC ;
 ACCRA-I ;		! correct suffixes
 ACCRA-OBL ;
 ACCRA-IICASE ;
 ACCRA-IICASE-SGCOM ;

LEXICON ACCRADECL_PLC-ORG
! These sublexica are irrelevant for ACCRA, but added
! for the sake of the lexicon MARJA
ACCRA-DC ;
 ACCRA-I ;		! correct suffixes
 ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
 ACCRA-IICASE-SGCOM ;
! ACCRA-IICASE ;


LEXICON ACCRADECL-LOAN
! These sublexica are irrelevant for ACCRA, but added
! for the sake of the lexicon MARJA
ACCRA-DC-LOAN ;
+Err/Lex: ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG_loc_ill_com ; ! asdf
!@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Lex:@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-IICASE; !
 ACCRA-IICASE-SGCOM ;

LEXICON RONDANE-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:e%> RONDANE-OBL ;

LEXICON RONDANE-SG-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:e%> RONDANE-SG-OBL ;

LEXICON RONDANE-LOAN ! Place names
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Lex:e%>  RONDANE-OBL ; ! XXX Why is regular inflection sub?
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom:e flagK ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Cmp/SgNom:e flagRHyph ; ! Why do we need RHyph here, when it is also defined in RONDANE-OBL?
!+Err/Orth:e%> PLACELASH ; !

LEXICON RONDANE-SG-LOAN ! Place names
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Lex:e%>  RONDANE-SG-OBL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom:e flagK ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Cmp/SgNom:e flagRHyph ;
!+Err/Orth:e%> PLACELASH ; !

LEXICON RONDANE-sur
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:e%> RONDANE-OBL ;

LEXICON RONDANE-fem
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:e%>  RONDANE-OBL ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:%>ž PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON RONDANE-mal
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:e%>  RONDANE-OBL ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:%>ž PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL


LEXICON RONDANE-obj
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:e%> RONDANE-OBL ;

LEXICON RONDANE-org
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:e%> RONDANE-OBL ;


LEXICON RONDANE-OBL
@U.Cap.Obl@ RONDANE-case ;

LEXICON RONDANE-case
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Cmp/SgNom: RHyph ;
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ;
+Ess:n K ;
+Sg+Ill:j K ;
+Sg+Gen: K ;
+Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth: RHyph ; ! for placenames
+Sg+Acc: K ;
+Sg+Loc:s K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:n K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:jn K ;
+Pl+Nom:t K ;
+Pl+Gen:jd9 K ;
+Pl+Acc:jd9 K ;
+Pl+Ill:jdda K ;
+Pl+Loc:jn K ;
+Pl+Com:jgujn K ;

LEXICON RONDANE-SG-OBL
@U.Cap.Obl@ RONDANE-SG-OBL-case ;

LEXICON RONDANE-SG-OBL-case
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Cmp/SgNom: RHyph ;
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ;
+Ess:n K ;
+Sg+Ill:j K ;
+Sg+Gen: K ;
+Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth: RHyph ;   ! for placenames
+Sg+Acc: K ;
+Sg+Loc:s K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:n K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:jn K ;
!+Pl+Nom:t K ;
!+Pl+Gen:jd9 K ;
!+Pl+Acc:jd9 K ;
!+Pl+Ill:jdda K ;
!+Pl+Loc:jn K ;
!+Pl+Com:jgujn K ;


LEXICON HAWAII-plc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: HAWAII-plc-derinfl ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: HAWAII-plc-derinfl ;

LEXICON HAWAII-plc-derinfl
@U.Cap.Obl@ HAWAII-case ;
@U.Cap.Opt@+Der1+Der/lasj+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:@U.Cap.Opt@ HAWAIILASH ;

LEXICON HAWAII-case
            +Cmp/SgNom:%>     RHyph ;
   +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:%>     RHyph ;   ! for placenames
               +Sg+Nom:     K ;
               +Sg+Acc:     K ;
               +Sg+Gen:     K ;
                  +Ess:%>jin  K ;
               +Sg+Ill:%>jii  K ;
               +Sg+Loc:%>jis  K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>jin  K ; !SOUTH
               +Sg+Com:%>jijn K ;
!              +Pl+Nom:%>jit  K ;
!                     :%>     ACCRA-DC ;
!                     :%>ji   ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
!                     :%>ji   ACCRA-IICASE ;


LEXICON HAWAIILASH
       :%>lažž ATTR      ;
       :lažž   JOHTOLAT0 ;
+Sg+Nom:lažža  PxVvowch  ; ! tentative.
   +Ess:lažžan K         ;
   +Ess:lažžan PxC       ;
       :lažža  LASJOBL   ; ! Under ISSORASSA-


LEXICON HAWAII-sur
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> ACCRA-DC ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> ACCRA-OBL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> ACCRA-IICASE ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>X5 ACCRA-IICASE-SGCOM ;

LEXICON SKOHTERMADII-plc
0@U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ SKOHTERMADIIDECL ;

LEXICON SKOHTERMADIIDECL !This lexicon now fixed according to Pekkas comments, TO
     +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:i        K     ; !
              +Sg+Nom:ij       K     ;
       +Sg+Nom+Use/NG:idºja    K     ;
       +Sg+Nom+Use/NG:eadºji   K     ;
     +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:i        K     ; !
       +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:ij       K     ;
              +Sg+Gen:ija      K     ;
       +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:eaji     K     ;
              +Sg+Acc:ija      K     ;
       +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:eaji     K     ;
  +Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:i        RHyph ; !
           +Cmp/SgNom:ij       RHyph ;
           +Cmp/SgGen:ij       RHyph ;
           +Cmp/SgGen:ija      RHyph ;
           +Cmp/SgGen:eaji     RHyph ;
!          +Cmp/PlGen:ijajd9   RHyph ;
!          +Cmp/PlGen:ejijd9   RHyph ;
              +Sg+Ill:idjij    K     ;
       +Sg+Ill+Use/NG:eadjáj   K     ;
              +Sg+Loc:ijas     K     ;
       +Sg+Loc+Use/NG:eajis    K     ;
!             +Pl+Nom:ijat     K     ;
!      +Pl+Nom+Use/NG:eajit    K     ;
              +Sg+Com:ijajn    K     ;
       +Sg+Com+Use/NG:ejijn    K     ;
!             +Pl+Gen:ijajd9   K     ;
!      +Pl+Gen+Use/NG:ejijd9   K     ;
!             +Pl+Acc:ijajd9   K     ;
!      +Pl+Acc+Use/NG:ejijd9   K     ;
!             +Pl+Ill:ijajde   K     ;
!      +Pl+Ill+Use/NG:ejijde   K     ;
!             +Pl+Loc:ijajn    K     ;
!      +Pl+Loc+Use/NG:ejijn    K     ;
!             +Pl+Com:ejijgujn K     ;
!      +Pl+Com+Use/NG:ijajgujn K     ;


LEXICON NIKOSIIJA-obj
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> NIKOSIIJADECL ;
